lt-LT: Stebulės ašies tipas: Su varžtais; Greito atleidimo; Prisukama (sriegiu); Pereinamoji ašis; Kita
da: Navakseltype: Fastboltet; Quick release; Skrues på; Thru-axle; Andet
es: Tipo de eje de cubo: Atornillable; Liberación rápida; Enroscable; Eje pasante; Otro
nl: Naafas type: Bolt-on; Snelspanner; Schroefas; Steekas; Overig
cs: Typ nábojové nápravy: Na šrouby; Rychloupínák; Na závit; Pevná osa; Ostatní
pt-PT: Tipo de eixo do cubo: Aparafusado; Aperto rápido; De rosca; Eixo passante; Outro
fr: Type d’axe de moyeu: Boulonné; Attache rapide; À visser; Axe traversant; Autre
pl: Typ osi piasty: Mocowanie na śruby; Szybkozamykacz; Nakręcana; Sztywna oś; Inne
sl-SI: Vrsta osi pesta: Pritrditev z vijaki; Hitro zapenjanje; Pritrditev z navojem; Prečna os; Drugo
pt-BR: Cubo tipo de eixo: Eixo de porca; Engate rápido; Rosqueável; Eixo passante; Outro
th: ประเภทเพลาดุมล้อ: แกนร้อยนอต; ปลดเร็ว; ขันสกรู; แกนสอด; อื่นๆ
en: Hub axle type: Bolt-on; Quick release; Screw-on; Thru-axle; Other
el: Τύπος άξονα πλήμνης: Με βίδες; Ταχείας απελευθέρωσης; Βιδωτό; Περαστός άξονας; Άλλο
ro-RO: Tipul axului butucului: Cu șuruburi; Eliberare rapidă; Cu înșurubare; Ax traversant; Altele
vi: Loại trục bánh xe: Bắt ốc; Tháo lắp nhanh; Vặn ốc; Trục xuyên; Khác
hr-HR: Vrsta osovine glavčine: S vijcima; Brzo otpuštanje; Na navoj; Osovina kroz glavčinu (Thru-axle); Ostalo
de: Nabenachsentyp: Schraubachse; Schnellspannachse; Aufschraubachse; Steckachse; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Typ nápravy náboja: Skrutkovacia; Rýchloupínacia; Závitová; Pevná os; Iné
zh-TW: 花鼓軸類型: 螺栓固定; 快拆; 旋入式; 貫通軸; 其他
nb: Navakseltype: Bolt-on; Hurtigkobling; Skrubar; Gjennomgående aksel; Annet
bg-BG: Тип ос на главината: С болтове; Бързо освобождаване; На винт; Проходна ос; Друго
hu: Kerékagy-tengely típusa: Csavarozható; Gyorskioldós; Rácsavarható; Átütőtengely; Egyéb
fi: Napa-akselin tyyppi: Pultattava; Pikalinkku; Ruuvattava; Läpiakseli; Muu
zh-CN: 轮毂轴类型: 螺栓固定式; 快拆式; 旋入式; 筒轴; 其他
it: Tipo di asse del mozzo: A bulloni; Sgancio rapido; A vite; Perno passante; Altro
ko: 허브 액슬 타입: 볼트 온; 퀵 릴리스; 스크류 온; 스루 액슬; 기타
tr: Göbek mili türü: Cıvatalı; Mandallı; Vidalı; Sokma mil; Diğer
ru: Тип оси втулки: На болтах; Эксцентрик; На гайках; Сквозная ось; Другое
sv: Navaxeltyp: Bultad; Snabbkoppling; Påskruvad; Genomgående axel; Övrigt
ja: ハブアクスルタイプ: ボルトオン; クイックリリース; スクリューオン; スルーアクスル; その他